Washington statutes.
RCW 18.20.180

Resident rights.

RCW 70.129.005 through 70.129.030, 70.129.040, and 70.129.050 through 70.129.170 apply to this chapter and persons regulated under this chapter.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 3 s 303; 1994 c 214 s 21.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 3: See note following RCW 70.128.005.

Conflict with federal requirements—1994 c 214: See RCW 70.129.901.